Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB788.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 51SOLITARY CONFINEMENTSec.5101. Definitions.5102. Solitary confinement prohibited.5103. Alternative disciplinary measures to solitary confinement.§ 5101. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Correctional institution or facility." Any of the 123456789101112131415161718 following:(1) A State correctional institution.(2) A county correctional institution.(3) A facility that confines a juvenile under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters).(4) An institution that detains inmates in accordance with Chapter 71 (relating to interstate compacts) or an intergovernmental service agreement or other contract with a Federal, State or county agency, including United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement."Solitary confinement." The confinement of an inmate in a correctional institution or facility due to disciplinary, administrative, protective, investigative, medical or other classification, in a cell or similarly confined holding or living space, alone or with other inmates for approximately 20 hours or more per day, with severely restricted activity, movement and social interaction.§ 5102. Solitary confinement prohibited. An inmate may not be placed in solitary confinement.§ 5103. Alternative disciplinary measures to solitary confinement.A correctional institution or facility shall implement alternative disciplinary measures to solitary confinement, which measures may include the following:(1) Limiting contact visits.(2) Restricting visitors to only the inmate's immediate family.(3) The loss of work opportunities.(4) Assigning additional unpaid work duties for no more than 14 days.20250SB0788PN0840 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) No more than 14 days of the loss of telephone, entertainment or yard time privileges.(6) No more than 14 days of the loss of commissary privileges.(7) Confining an inmate to the inmate's own cell in the general population area.(8) A reprimand or warning.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0788PN0840 - 3 - 12345678